DIAGNOSTICS -

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

DI-101

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XS-01

DTC C 1254 /54 Pressure Switch Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Eitherofthefollowing 1.or2.isdetected:
1 .Afterturnlng the.lgnmon swﬂch ON, shortoropen circuit « Pressure switch (PHor PL)
C1254/54 in pressure switch (PL) continued for more than 1 sec ) o
. L . . ¢ Pressure switch circuit
2. After turning the ignition switch ON open in pressure
switch (PH) continuedformorethan 1 sec.
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DI-102 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check pressure switch (PL) resistance.

PREPARATION:
@ (a) Disconnect the connector (8P) from the hydraulic brake
booster.

(b)  With ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal more
than 40 times to decrease the accumulator pressure.

HINT:

When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction

force becomes light and stroke becomes longer.

rosos7| CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals PL and PLG of hydrau-

lic brake booster connector.

OK:
Resistance:5. 1 - 6.3k Q
HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI-4).

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.

@

2 | Check pressure switch (PH) resistance.

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the connector (5P) from the hydraulic brake
booster.

(b)  With ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal more
than 40 times to decrease the accumulator pressure.

HINT:

When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction

force becomes light and stroke becomes longer.

Fososs] CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals PH and PHG of hydrau-

lic brake booster connector.

OK:
Resistance:0.9 - 1.1 kQ2
HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI-4).
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-103
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.

@

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between pressure
switch and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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